Vermont statutes. Title 20 Internal Security and Public Safety
Article 1. General Provisions

§ 3581.
General requirements.

A person who is the owner of a dog or wolf-hybrid more than six months old shall annually on or before April 1 cause it to be registered, numbered, described, and licensed on a form approved by the Secretary for one year from that day in the office of the clerk of the municipality in which the dog or wolf-hybrid is kept. A person who owns a working farm dog and who intends to use that dog on a farm pursuant to the exemptions in section 3549 of this title shall cause the working farm dog to be registered as a working farm dog and shall, in addition to all other fees required by this section, pay $5.00 for a working farm dog license. The owner of a dog or wolf-hybrid shall cause it to wear a collar and attach a license tag issued by the municipal clerk to the collar. Dog or wolf-hybrid owners shall pay for the license $4.00 for each neutered dog or wolf-hybrid, and $8.00 for each unneutered dog or wolf-hybrid. If the license fee for any dog or wolf-hybrid is not paid on or before April 1, its owner or keeper may thereafter procure a license for that license year by paying a fee of 50 percent in excess of that otherwise required.

Before a person shall be entitled to obtain a license for a neutered dog or wolf-hybrid, he or she shall exhibit to the clerk a certificate signed by a duly licensed veterinarian showing that the dog or wolf-hybrid has been sterilized.

A mandatory license fee surcharge of $4.00 per license shall be collected by each city, town, or village for the purpose of funding the dog, cat, and wolf-hybrid spaying and neutering program established in chapter 193, subchapter 6 of this title.
(c) (1) A mandatory license fee surcharge of $4.00 per license shall be collected by each city, town, or village for the purpose of funding the dog, cat, and wolf-hybrid spaying and neutering program established in chapter 193, subchapter 6 of this title.

An optional license fee surcharge of up to $10.00 per license is to be implemented by the legislative body of a city, town, or village that has established an animal and rabies control program for the sole purpose of funding the rabies control program.

The license fee surcharges in this subsection shall not be considered part of the license fee for purposes of calculating a penalty for late payment.

Before obtaining a license for a dog or wolf-hybrid six months of age or older, a person shall deliver to the municipal clerk a certificate or a certified copy thereof issued by a duly licensed veterinarian, stating that the dog or wolf-hybrid has received a current preexposure rabies vaccination with a vaccine approved by the Secretary, and the person shall certify that the dog or wolf-hybrid described in the certificate or copy is the dog or wolf-hybrid to be licensed. The municipal clerk shall keep the certificates or copies thereof on file. The Secretary shall prescribe the size and format of rabies certificates. The owner of any such dog or wolf-hybrid shall maintain a copy of the rabies vaccination form and provide it to State or municipal officials upon request.

For the purposes of licensing a dog or wolf-hybrid, a current vaccination against rabies means that:

All dog and wolf-hybrid vaccinations recognized by State and local authorities shall be administered by a licensed veterinarian or under the supervision of a licensed veterinarian.

All dogs and wolf-hybrids over three months of age shall be vaccinated against rabies. The initial vaccination shall be valid for 12 months. Within nine to 12 months of the initial vaccination, the animal must receive a booster vaccination.

All subsequent vaccinations following the initial vaccination shall be valid for 36 months.

All vaccinations, including the initial vaccination, shall be with a U.S. Department of Agriculture-approved three-year rabies vaccine product.

In addition to the license fees assessed in subsections (a) and (c) of this section and section 3583 of this title, municipal clerks shall assess a $1.00 fee for each license sold. The clerks shall forward the fees collected under this subsection to the State Treasurer on or before the 15th day of May, September, and January of each year, together with an accounting of the licenses sold. The funds collected under this subsection are to be used for rabies control programs. For this purpose, on or before the 30th days of May, September, and January, the State Treasurer shall disburse the funds collected under this subsection as follows:

Forty-five percent to the Fish and Wildlife Fund.

Forty-five percent to the Commissioner of Health.

Ten percent to the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets.

HISTORY:

Amended

1965, No. 36

, § 1, eff. April 28, 1965;

1966, No. 62

(Sp. Sess.), § 1;

1977, No. 215

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 12, 1978;

1979, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Feb. 28, 1980;

1989, No. 256

(Adj. Sess.), § 10(a); eff. Jan. 1, 1991;

1993, No. 213

(Adj. Sess.), § 9, eff. April 1, 1995;

2001, No. 39

, § 5;

2003, No. 42

, § 2, eff. May 27, 2003;

2003, No. 163

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 37, 38;

2007, No. 153

(Adj. Sess.), § 13;

2009, No. 48

, § 9, eff. May 28, 2009;

2015, No. 57

, § 31;

2017, No. 113

(Adj. Sess.), § 144;

2021, No. 20

, § 199.

§ 3581a.
Immunization.

An owner of a domestic pet or wolf-hybrid shall have that animal inoculated against rabies by a licensed veterinarian in accordance with section 3581 of this title, if applicable, and with rules adopted by the Secretary.

No rabies vaccine may be used for domestic pets unless it is first approved by the Secretary.

Until the Secretary approves a rabies vaccine for use on wolf-hybrids, these animals shall be vaccinated with a vaccine approved by the Secretary for domestic dogs and a veterinarian inoculating a wolf-hybrid in accordance with this section shall not be liable for the failure of the rabies vaccine to protect the animal from rabies nor for any adverse reaction that may be attributable to the vaccination.

A person may use an approved vaccine to inoculate a feral feline that takes up residence in a building other than the person’s home and need not use the services of a licensed veterinarian for this purpose.

The Secretary of the Agency of Agriculture, Food and Markets and the Department of Health shall provide notices to veterinarians designed to help them to inform people about the provisions of this section regarding cats, wolf-hybrids, and other domestic pets.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 213

(Adj. Sess.), § 10, eff. June 15, 1994; amended

2003, No. 42

, § 2, eff. May 27, 2003.

§ 3582.
Dogs or wolf-hybrids obtained after April 1.

A person who becomes the owner after April 1 of a dog or wolf-hybrid six months old or older that has not been licensed, or a person who owns, keeps, or harbors a dog or wolf-hybrid that becomes six months old after April 1, shall within 30 days apply for and obtain a license for the dog or wolf-hybrid in the same manner as the annual license is obtained. If an application under this section is made after October 1, the fee for the license shall be one-half the amount otherwise required. If the license fee is not paid within 30 days, the owner may thereafter procure a license for that license year by paying a license fee of 50 percent in excess of that otherwise required.

HISTORY:

Amended

1977, No. 215

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. April 12, 1978;

1979, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. Feb. 28, 1980;

1993, No. 213

(Adj. Sess.), § 11, eff. April 1, 1995;

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 125.

§ 3582a.
Repealed.
1977 (Adj. Sess.), § 15, eff. April 12, 1978.

§ 3583.
Domestic pets and wolf-hybrids kept for breeding purposes.

The owner or keeper of domestic pets and wolf-hybrids kept for breeding purposes may take out annually, on or before April 1, a special license for the domestic pets or wolf-hybrids, provided:

He or she keeps the domestic pets or wolf-hybrids within a proper enclosure. A proper enclosure is a locked fence or structure of sufficient height and sufficient depth into the ground to prevent the entry of young children and to prevent the animal from escaping. A proper enclosure also provides humane shelter for the animal.

The domestic pets or wolf-hybrids at all times have a current vaccination against rabies.

When the number of domestic pets or wolf-hybrids so kept does not exceed ten, the fee shall be $30.00 and for each additional domestic pet or wolf-hybrid so kept, an annual fee of $3.00.

Domestic pets and wolf-hybrids covered by the special license pursuant to this section shall be exempt from other license fees, and all licenses under this section are exempt from the surcharge enacted under subsection (c) of section 3581 of this title.

If the license fee is not paid by April 1, the owner or keeper may thereafter procure a license for that license year by paying a fee of 50 percent in excess of that otherwise required. These license fees are in addition to any fees required for the operation of a kennel under subchapter 3 of this chapter.

HISTORY:

Amended

1977, No. 215

(Adj. Sess.), § 5, eff. April 12, 1978;

1979, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 5, eff. Feb. 28, 1980;

1993, No. 213

(Adj. Sess.), § 12, eff. April 1, 1995;

2021, No. 20

, § 200.

§§ 3584-3586.
Repealed.
1977, No. 215 (Adj. Sess.), § 15, eff. April 12, 1978.

§ 3587.
Dogs brought into State.

Without obtaining a Vermont license, a person may bring or cause to be brought into the State for a period not exceeding 90 days one or more licensed dog or dogs bearing the identification of the owner, provided that the owner possesses a certificate signed by a licensed veterinarian or a State official of any other state that the dog has received a rabies vaccination that is current for the 90 days following entry into the State.

HISTORY:

Amended

1977, No. 215

(Adj. Sess.), § 6, eff. April 12, 1978;

1979, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 6, eff. Feb. 28, 1980.

§ 3588.
Issuance of licenses; record of licenses.

Municipal clerks shall issue licenses and receive the money for the license, and pay the amount received into the municipal treasury within 60 days of receipt, retaining to their own use $2.00 for each license or permit, and shall include with the amount deposited into the municipal treasury a sworn statement of the amount received and paid over by them pursuant to this section.

HISTORY:

Amended

1966, No. 62

(Sp. Sess.), § 3;

1971, No. 84

, § 11;

1977, No. 215

(Adj. Sess.), § 7, eff. April 12, 1978;

1993, No. 213

(Adj. Sess.), § 13, eff. June 15, 1994;

2021, No. 20

, § 201.

§ 3589.
Record of licenses.

Municipal clerks shall also keep a record of licenses issued by them, with the names of the owners or keepers of the dogs or wolf-hybrids licensed and the names registered numbers, and descriptions of such dogs or wolf-hybrids.

HISTORY:

Amended

1993, No. 213

(Adj. Sess.), § 14, eff. April 1, 1995.

§ 3590.
List of dogs and wolf-hybrids not licensed.

The legislative body shall annually designate one or more persons to maintain a list of unlicensed, inoculated, and licensed dogs and wolf-hybrids owned or kept in their municipality and to submit the list to the municipal clerk.

On receiving a list of dogs and wolf-hybrids from persons authorized by the legislative body, the municipal clerk shall notify the owners or keepers of all dogs and wolf-hybrids named on the list that have not already been licensed or inoculated and after May 30 shall furnish to the legislative body a list of dogs and wolf-hybrids not licensed or inoculated as required by law. Owners shall also be notified that unlicensed or uninoculated dogs or wolf-hybrids may be destroyed.

HISTORY:

Amended

1965, No. 36

, § 3, eff. April 28, 1965;

1977, No. 215

(Adj. Sess.), § 8, eff. April 12, 1978;

1979, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 7, eff. Feb. 28, 1990;

1993, No. 213

(Adj. Sess.), § 15, eff. April 1, 1995.

§ 3591.
Transfer of license.

A license from a municipal clerk shall be valid in any part of the State and may be transferred with the dog or wolf-hybrid licensed, provided such license is recorded by the clerk of the municipality where such dog or wolf-hybrid is kept.

HISTORY:

Amended

1993, No. 213

(Adj. Sess.), § 16, eff. April 1, 1995.

§ 3592.
Repealed. 1993, No. 213 (Adj. Sess.), § 32, eff. June 15, 1994.